Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-3101
Act, how cited.

Sections 44-3101 to 44-3112 shall be known and may be cited as the Nebraska Professional Association Mutual Insurance Company Act.

Laws 1978, LB 656, § 1.